Maine, session 132, LD2003.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Transfer of settlement funds. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer $600,000 from the Administration -
Attorney General, Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of the
Attorney General from funds received from settlement agreements to the unappropriated
surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30, 2027.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC BROADCASTING CORPORATION, MAINE
Maine Public Broadcasting Corporation 0033
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for broadcast infrastructure equipment to enable
localization of public safety information and emergency alert messaging on the statewide
radio network operated by the Maine Public Broadcasting Corporation.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $600,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $600,000
Page 1 - 132LR2630(07)